Utah statutes.
59-2-704.5.   Commission to adopt rules -- Legislative review.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and after receiving the advice of the Utah Assessors Association, the commission shall by rule adopt standards for determining acceptable assessment levels and valuation deviations within each county.  The standards shall be used for determining whether factoring or corrective action is required under Subsection 59-2-704(2).

(2)  As part of its review of the standards for determining acceptable assessment levels and valuation deviations within each county, the commission shall consider any relevant standards promulgated by the International Association of Assessing Officers.

(3)  By October 1, 1998, and every five years thereafter, the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee shall review the commission's standards and determine whether the standards should be modified.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

